Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-35 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, “livestock” means cattle, elk,
reindeer, bison, horses, deer, sheep, goats, swine, poultry
including egg-producing poultry, llamas, alpacas, live fish,
crawfish, and other animals that are:
1. Part of a foundation herd including dairy producing cattle
or offspring; or

2. Purchased as part of a normal operation and not to obtain
additional benefits under this section.
B. The State Board of Agriculture shall promulgate rules
regarding the handling of livestock involved in vehicular accidents.
C. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
shall provide guidance and recommendations to county emergency
management organizations in the handling of such livestock, as
provided in Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 955.1 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, “livestock” means cattle, elk,
reindeer, bison, horses, deer, sheep, goats, swine, poultry
including egg-producing poultry, llamas, alpacas, live fish,
crawfish, and other animals that are:
1. Part of a foundation herd including dairy producing cattle
or offspring; or
2. Purchased as part of a normal operation and not to obtain
additional benefits under this section.
B. Any wrecker or towing service that responds to the scene of
an accident involving livestock shall, upon being made aware of such
involvement, immediately contact the emergency management
organization of the county in which such accident occurred. The
emergency management organization shall assist with the handling of
such livestock involved in the accident, in accordance with the
promulgated rules and guidance of the Oklahoma Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry as provided in Section 1 of this
act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2134 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 2134 Page 3